Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1241
Temporary emergency jurisdiction.

(a) A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction if the child is present in this state and the child has been abandoned or it is necessary in an emergency to protect the child because the child, or a sibling or parent of the child, is subjected to or threatened with mistreatment or abuse.

(b) If there is no previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and a child custody proceeding has not been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240, a child custody determination made under this section remains in effect until an order is obtained from a court of a state having jurisdiction under such sections. If a child custody proceeding has not been or is not commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under such sections, a child custody determination made under this section becomes a final determination, if it so provides, and this state becomes the home state of the child.

(c) If there is a previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under the act, or a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240, any order issued by a court of this state under this section shall specify in the order a period that the court considers adequate to allow the person seeking an order to obtain an order from the state having jurisdiction under such sections. The order issued in this state remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other state within the period specified or the period expires.

(d) A court of this state which has been asked to make a child custody determination under this section, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240, shall immediately communicate with the other court. A court of this state which is exercising jurisdiction pursuant to such sections, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court of another state under a statute similar to this section shall immediately communicate with the court of that state to resolve the emergency, protect the safety of the parties and the child, and determine a period for the duration of the temporary order.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 16.